Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-503
Family military leave authorized; conditions.

(1) Any employer that employs between fifteen and fifty employees shall provide up to fifteen days of unpaid family military leave to an employee during the time federal or state deployment orders are in effect, subject to the conditions set forth in this section.

(2) An employer that employs more than fifty employees shall provide up to thirty days of unpaid family military leave to an employee during the time federal or state deployment orders are in effect, subject to the conditions set forth in this section.

(3) The employee shall give at least fourteen days' notice of the intended date upon which the family military leave will commence if leave will consist of five or more consecutive work days. Where able, the employee shall consult with the employer to schedule the leave so as to not unduly disrupt the operations of the employer. Employees taking family military leave for less than five consecutive days shall give the employer advanced notice as is practicable. The employer may require certification from the proper military authority to verify the employee's eligibility for the family military leave requested.

Laws 2007, LB497, § 3.